Maine, session 132, LD391.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to amend the law in order to continue to advance state recognition
of the inherent rights of the Wabanaki Nations and restore rights available to other federally
recognized Indian tribes under federal law.
Page 1 - 132LR1561(01)